District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Child Support Improvement Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 519(c)(5) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982,
effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.19(c)(5)), is repealed.
Sec. 3. The District of Columbia Child Support Enforcement Amendment Act of 1985,
effective February 24, 1987 (D.C. Law 6-166; D.C. Official Code § 46-201 et seq.), is amended
by adding a new section 4a to read as follows:
“Sec. 4a. Pass-through of current support and arrears.
“(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the District shall pay to a family receiving TANF an
amount equal to the first $200 of a current monthly child support payment made to the District
for a family receiving TANF under an assignment of child support made pursuant to section
519(b) of the District of Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C.
Law 4-101; D.C. Official Code § 4-205.19(b)).
“(b) Subject to appropriations and notwithstanding any other law, the District shall pay
to a family receiving TANF an amount equal to the first $200 of a child support that satisfies a
current monthly child support obligation or accrued child support arrears made to the District
under an assignment of child support made pursuant to section 519(b) of the District of
Columbia Public Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C. Official
Code § 4-205.19(b)).
“(c) Subject to appropriations and notwithstanding any other law, the District shall pay
to a family that is currently receiving or formerly received TANF an amount equal to all child
support payments, including current support and arrears payments, made to the District under an
assignment of child support made pursuant to section 519(b) of the District of Columbia Public


Assistance Act of 1982, effective April 6, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-101; D.C Official Code § 4-
205.19(b)).”.
Sec. 4. Section 15-101 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “subsection (b) of this section” and insert the phrase
“subsections (a-1) and (b) of this section” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “twelve years” and insert the phrase “12 years” in its place.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) For support orders entered in cases filed 120 days after the effective date of the
Child Support Improvement Amendment Act of 2026, the 12-year period of limitation on the
enforceability of a final judgment or final decree for the payment of money provided by
subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to judgments or decrees for past-due child support.
Child support judgments entered pursuant to these support orders shall be enforceable for a
period of 5 years after the date of the emancipation of the youngest child subject to the support
order. The time during which the judgment creditor is stayed from enforcing the judgment as
provided in subsection (a) of this section shall not be computed as a part of the period within
which the judgment is enforceable by execution.”.
(c) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “the twelve-year period provided by
subsection (a)” and inserting the phrase “the periods provided by subsections (a) and (a-1)” in its
place.
Sec. 5. Applicability.
(a)(1) Amended section 4a(b) within section 3 shall apply 240 days after the date of
inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.


(2) Amended section 4a(c) within section 3 shall apply upon the date of inclusion
of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of inclusion of the fiscal effect in an
approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council of
the certifications.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notices of the certification to be published in
100 the District of Columbia Register.
101 (2) The dates of publication of the notices of certification shall not affect the
102 applicability of the provisions identified in subsection (a) of this section.
103 Sec. 6. Fiscal impact statement.
104 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
105 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
106 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
107 Sec. 7. Effective date.
108 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of a veto by
109 the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
110 review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
111 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).